Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1467
Person; independent expenditure report; when filed; contents; late filing fee; violation; penalty.

(1) Any person, other than a committee, who makes an independent expenditure advocating the election of a candidate or the defeat of a candidate's opponents or the qualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question, which is in an amount of more than two hundred fifty dollars, shall file a report of the independent expenditure, within ten days, with the commission.

(2) The report shall be made on an independent expenditure report form provided by the commission and shall include the date of the expenditure, a brief description of the nature of the expenditure, the amount of the expenditure, the name and address of the person to whom it was paid, the name and address of the person filing the report, and the name, address, occupation, employer, and principal place of business of each person who contributed more than two hundred fifty dollars to the expenditure.

(3) Any person required under this section to file a report for an independent expenditure advocating for the qualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question shall include an accompanying certification with such report affirming that no funds have been intentionally accepted aggregating in excess of one hundred thousand dollars from one or more foreign nationals within the four-year period immediately preceding the date the expenditure was made.

(4) Any person who fails to file a report of an independent expenditure with the commission shall pay to the commission a late filing fee of fifty dollars for each day the statement remains not filed in violation of this section, not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars.

(5) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 67;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 42;

Laws 1996, LB 1263, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 416, § 13;

Laws 2001, LB 242, § 6;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 18;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 17;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 30;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 56.
July 18, 2026